Utah statutes.
16-16-814.   Waiver of notice of meeting.

(1)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may waive any required notice of a meeting of the board of directors in a record before, during, or after the meeting.

(2)  Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director's participation in a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting unless:

(a)  the director objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the director's arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken at the meeting; or

(b)  the director promptly objects upon the introduction of any matter for which notice under Section 16-16-813 has not been given and does not thereafter vote in favor of or otherwise assent to the action taken on the matter.



Enacted by Chapter 363, 2008 General Session

